Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2149.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.03, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3034.03, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.03. Arizona beef council; termination July 1, 2034 A. The Arizona beef council terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 3, chapter 11, article 2 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 412955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona beef council as a self-financed program to help market, develop, maintain and expand the state, national and foreign markets for beef and beef products produced, processed or manufactured in this state. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.